District of Columbia statutes.
4-561.10

OCME reporting requirement.

In the annual report filed pursuant to § 5-1501.04(a)(5), the Director of the DFS shall include the number of sexual assault forensic examination kits received from the MPD and the number of sexual assault forensic examination kits processed by the DFS, including the time it took for each kit to be processed.

History

Nov. 20, 2014, D.C. Law 20-139, § 210, 61 DCR 5913